Washington statutes.
RCW 15.54.265

Intent—1998 c 36.

(1) The legislature intends to strengthen the state's fertilizer adulteration laws to protect human health and the environment by:

(a) Ensuring that all fertilizers meet standards for allowable metals;

(b) Allowing fertilizer purchasers and users to know about the contents of fertilizer products; and

(c) Clarifying the department of ecology's oversight authority over waste-derived fertilizers.

(2) The legislature intends to provide better information to the public on fertilizers, soils, and potential health effects by authorizing additional studies on plant uptake of metals and levels of dioxins in soils and products.

[ 1998 c 36 s 1.]

NOTES:

Short title—1998 c 36: "This act may be known and cited as the fertilizer regulation act." [ 1998 c 36 s 24.]